New York, session 2025-2026, S7787.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 1352 of the 2 racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law as added by section 1 of 3 part R of chapter 58 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) (i) For any gaming facility that does not qualify under subdivi- 5 sion two of section thirteen hundred twenty-one-a of this article, is 6 licensed under title two-A of this article, and is located within New 7 York City, revenues shall be distributed in the following manner, except 8 as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph: 9 [(i)] (1) fifty percent of the taxes imposed by this article, and any 10 interest and penalties imposed by the commission relating to those taxes 11 shall be deposited to a sole custody fund established under the gaming 12 commission, and paid monthly, without appropriation, directly to the 13 metropolitan transportation authority commercial gaming revenue fund 14 established under section one thousand two hundred seventy-j of the 15 public authorities law; and 16 [(ii)] (2) fifty percent of the taxes imposed by this article, and any 17 interest and penalties imposed by the commission relating to those taxes 18 shall be deposited into the commercial gaming revenue fund established 19 under section ninety-seven-nnnn of the state finance law by the commis- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11477-09-6 S. 7787--A 2 1 sion and shall be appropriated or transferred only for elementary and 2 secondary education or real property tax relief. 3 (ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for any host county 4 and host municipality that was appropriated aid in the year two thousand 5 twenty-five pursuant to paragraph b of subdivision three of section 6 ninety-seven-nnnn of the state finance law and is located within one 7 hundred miles of any gaming facility licensed under title two-A of this 8 article, taxes collected from gaming facilities licensed under title 9 two-A of this article shall be used by the commission, before the 10 distributions otherwise required by clauses one and two of subparagraph 11 (i) of this paragraph to hold such host counties and host municipalities 12 harmless so that the host counties and host municipalities do not 13 receive less money in any state fiscal year following the commencement 14 of gaming operations of any gaming facility licensed under title two-A 15 of this article than such host counties or host municipalities received 16 pursuant to subparagraph b of subdivision three of section ninety-sev- 17 en-nnnn of the state finance law in their highest annual aid in any 18 state fiscal year since the commencement of gaming operations from any 19 gaming facility licensed pursuant to title two of this article. The 20 commission shall annually determine the amount necessary to satisfy the 21 requirements of this subparagraph and shall deposit such amount into the 22 commercial gaming revenue fund established under section ninety-seven- 23 nnnn of the state finance law for allocation to such host counties and 24 host municipalities for real property tax relief or education assist- 25 ance. The provisions of this subparagraph shall apply as of the first 26 full state fiscal year in which any gaming facility licensed under title 27 two-A of this article has commenced gaming operations. For purposes of 28 determining whether a host county or host municipality is located within 29 one hundred miles of a gaming facility licensed under title two-A of 30 this article, distance shall be measured in a straight line from the 31 premises of such gaming facility to the premises of the gaming facility 32 licensed pursuant to title two of this article for which such county or 33 municipality is a host county or host municipality. Nothing in this 34 subparagraph shall require a gaming facility licensee to remit any 35 amount in excess of the taxes, interest and penalties otherwise imposed 36 pursuant to this article. 37 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.